Massachusetts, session 194th, H4589.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Town of
Ludlow is hereby authorized to pay from any available funds during the current fiscal year a
certain unpaid bill incurred by said Town totaling ninety-eight thousand six hundred twenty
dollars and zero cents as set forth in an invoice on file in the office of the Town Administrator in
the Town of Ludlow for goods supplied and services rendered to said Town during the year two
thousand and twenty four, which bill is legally unenforceable against said town.
SECTION 2. No bill shall be approved by the Town or paid by said Town under the
authority of this act, unless and until a certificate has been signed and filed with said Town
stating, under penalties of perjury, that the goods or services for which said bill had been
submitted were ordered by an official or an employee of said Town, and that such goods were
delivered and actually received by said Town and that such services were rendered to such
Town, or both.
of 2

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2